Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202573-905
Technology-related product or service; certifications required; exception.

(1) A public entity shall require a company that submits a bid or proposal or enters into any contract or contract renewal with any public entity for any technology-related product or service to certify:

(a) That the company is not a scrutinized company;

(b) That the company will not subcontract with any scrutinized company for any aspect of performance of the contemplated contract; and

(c) That any products or services to be provided do not originate with a scrutinized company.

(2) This section shall not apply to the contracts described in section 73-908.

Laws 2024, LB1300, § 11;

Laws 2025, LB644, § 28.